Connecticut, session 2026, HB05363.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 8-30g of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Affordable housing development" means a proposed housing
development which is (A) assisted housing, or (B) a set-aside
development;
(2) "Affordable housing application" means any application made to
a commission in connection with an affordable housing development by
a person who proposes to develop such affordable housing;
(3) "Assisted housing" means housing which is receiving, or will
receive, financial assistance under any governmental program for the
construction or substantial rehabilitation of low and moderate income
LCO No. 2188 1 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5363
housing, and any housing occupied by persons receiving rental
assistance under chapter 319uu or Section 1437f of Title 42 of the United
States Code;
(4) "Commission" means a zoning commission, planning
commission, planning and zoning commission, zoning board of appeals
or municipal agency exercising zoning or planning authority;
(5) "Municipality" means any town, city or borough, whether
consolidated or unconsolidated;
(6) "Set-aside development" means a development in which not less
than thirty per cent of the dwelling units will be conveyed by deeds
containing covenants or restrictions which shall require that, for at least
forty years after the initial occupation of the proposed development,
such dwelling units shall be sold or rented at, or below, prices which
will preserve the units as housing for which persons and families pay
thirty per cent or less of their annual income, where such income is less
than or equal to eighty per cent of the median income, except as
provided in subdivision (1) of subsection (d) of this section. In a set-
aside development, of the dwelling units conveyed by deeds containing
covenants or restrictions, a number of dwelling units equal to not less
than fifteen per cent of all dwelling units in the development shall be
sold or rented to persons and families whose income is less than or equal
to sixty per cent of the median income and the remainder of the dwelling
units conveyed by deeds containing covenants or restrictions shall be
sold or rented to persons and families whose income is less than or equal
to eighty per cent of the median income;
(7) "Median income" means, after adjustments for family size, the
lesser of the state median income or the area median income for the area
in which the municipality containing the affordable housing
development is located, as determined by the United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development; and
(8) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Housing.
LCO No. 2188 2 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5363
Sec. 2. Subsection (d) of section 8-30g of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(d) (1) A person renting a covenant or deed-restricted dwelling unit
in a set-aside development shall be permitted to enter an agreement
with the landlord to continue renting such dwelling unit at the
affordable rental rate the person or family was previously entitled to for
not more than three years after such person's or family's income exceeds
either sixty per cent or eighty per cent of the median income, as
applicable, provided such set-aside development has not been allocated
any federal low-income housing tax credits.
(2) Notwithstanding the income ineligibility of a person or family
renting a covenant or deed-restricted dwelling unit in a set-aside
development under subdivision (1) of this subsection, such dwelling
unit shall count toward the set-aside percentage required to be rented
to persons or families within the income limits specified in subdivision
(6) of subsection (a) of this section.
(3) Nothing in subdivision (1) of this subsection shall be construed to
(A) expand the rights of a person or family to occupy a dwelling unit
beyond the terms of the applicable rental agreement, or (B) limit the
rights of the owner of a set-aside development under chapter 832.
[(d)] (4) For any affordable dwelling unit that is rented as part of a
set-aside development, if the maximum monthly housing cost, as
calculated in accordance with subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of this
section, would exceed one hundred per cent of the Section 8 fair market
rent as determined by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development, in the case of units set aside for persons and
families whose income is less than or equal to sixty per cent of the
median income, then such maximum monthly housing cost shall not
exceed one hundred per cent of said Section 8 fair market rent. If the
maximum monthly housing cost, as calculated in accordance with
LCO No. 2188 3 of 4

Raised Bill No. 5363
subdivision (6) of subsection (a) of this section, would exceed one
hundred twenty per cent of the Section 8 fair market rent, as determined
by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development,
in the case of units set aside for persons and families whose income is
less than or equal to eighty per cent of the median income, then such
maximum monthly housing cost shall not exceed one hundred twenty
per cent of such Section 8 fair market rent.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 8-30g(a)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 8-30g(d)